Florida, session 2026, SB372.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsections (1), (2), and (5) of section 15 1009.265, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 16 1009.265âState employee and sheriffâs office employee fee 17 waivers.â 18 (1)âAs a benefit to the employer and employees of the state 19 and each sheriffâs office in the state, subject to approval by 20 an employeeâs agency head or sheriff, or the equivalent, each 21 state university and Florida College System institution shall 22 waive tuition and fees for state employees and sheriffâs office 23 employees to enroll for up to 6 credit hours of courses per term 24 on a space-available basis. 25 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer, in cooperation with the 26 Florida College System institutions and state universities, 27 shall identify and implement ways to ease the administrative 28 burden to Florida College System institutions and state 29 universities, including, but not limited to, providing easier 30 access to verify state or sheriffâs office employment. 31 (5)âFor purposes of this section:, 32 (a)âEmployees of the state include employees of the 33 executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state 34 government, except for persons employed by a state university. 35 (b)âEmployees of a sheriffâs office include any full-time 36 sworn law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or civilian 37 employee of the sheriffâs office. 38 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.